Utah statutes.
36-1-101.   Utah State Senate -- District boundaries.

(1)  As used in this chapter:

(a)  "New county boundary" means the adjusted common boundary between Salt Lake County and Utah County as certified by the lieutenant governor on December 29, 2005.

(b)  "Old county boundary" means the common boundary between Salt Lake County and Utah County before the boundary change certified by the lieutenant governor on December 29, 2005.

(c)  "Southwestern intersection" means the western-most three way intersection of the old county boundary, the new county boundary, and the boundary separating Senate District 9 and Senate District 11.

(2)  The Utah State Senate shall consist of 29 members, with one member to be elected from each Utah State Senate district.

(3) (a)  The Legislature adopts the official census population figures and maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce developed in connection with the taking of the 2000 national decennial census as the official data for establishing Senate district boundaries.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the numbers and boundaries of the Senate districts are designated and established by the maps attached to the bill that enacts this section.

(4)  Because of the new county boundary separating Salt Lake County and Utah County, the boundary separating Senate District 9 and Senate District 11 that followed the old county boundary is changed to follow the new county boundary eastward from the southwestern intersection to the point where the existing boundary of Senate District 9 turns north from the old county boundary.

